Utah statutes.
40-2-302.   Reporting of an unsafe condition in coal mines -- Adverse action prohibited.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, upon the office's receipt of information from a person of a possible unsafe condition in a coal mine located in Utah, the office may:

(a)  notify the federal Mine Safety and Health Administration;

(b)  notify another appropriate federal, state, or local government agency;

(c)  contact the operator of the coal mine;

(d)  refer the information to the council on a confidential basis; or

(e)  take any other authorized action.

(2)  The commission, council, or office may not disclose or otherwise make public the identity of a person who reports a possible unsafe condition in a coal mine located in Utah unless that person authorizes the commission, council, or office to disclose the person's identity.

(3)  A coal mine operator may not take adverse action against a person because that person:

(a)  reports an alleged unsafe mine condition; or

(b)  testifies, assists, or participates in any manner in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing under this chapter.

